Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-423
Citation; Supreme Court; prescribe form; contents.

To achieve uniformity, the Supreme Court may prescribe the form of citation. The citation shall include a description of the crime or offense charged, the time and place at which the person cited is to appear, a warning that failure to appear in accordance with the command of the citation is a punishable offense, and such other matter as the court deems appropriate, but shall not include a place for the cited person's social security number. The court may provide that a copy of the citation shall constitute the complaint filed in the trial court.

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 82, § 11.